Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 22

Services to Families of Preschool Children with Disabilities

71-4-2201. Development of incentives.

To the extent that federal funds are not jeopardized and in accordance with responsibilities required to be performed by the interagency coordinating council created pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1482, the council shall advise and assist the lead agency appointed pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1476 [repealed] in developing incentives that will encourage programs serving young children with disabilities to provide or improve services to families of preschool children with disabilities. The development of the incentives may include, but is not limited to:

Identifying and publicizing model programs with parent involvement components or model practices for services to parents;

Assuring that training opportunities are provided to educate program staff in current best practices for serving families; and

Identifying and coordinating all available resources within the state from federal, state, local and private sources for existing programs and for future programs to hire staff to provide training and support services to parents.

Acts 1988, ch. 625, § 1; 2011, ch. 47, § 105.

Compiler's Notes. Former 20 U.S.C. § 1476, concerning requirements for a statewide system providing early intervention services to all infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families, was repealed, effective July 1, 1998.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. Preschools generally, §49-6-101.

Special education, title 49, ch. 10.

Statewide early intervention program for handicapped infants, toddlers, and their families, §49-10-702.

71-4-403. Purchase of materials without formal procedures.

71-4-1210. Veterans education benefits.